Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-707
Report.

The Department
of Health and Human Services shall issue an annual report to the Governor
and the Legislature on September 1 for the preceding fiscal year's activities
of the Women's Health Initiative of Nebraska. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The report shall include progress reports on any
programs, activities, or educational promotions that were undertaken by the
initiative. The report shall also include a status report on women's health
in Nebraska and any results achieved by the initiative.

Laws 2000, LB 480, § 7;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 453;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 104.